District of Columbia statutes.
7-304

Penalties; prosecutions.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any person who willfully violates this chapter or any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000.

(b)

Any person who willfully discloses, receives, uses, or permits the use of information in violation of § 7-302 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, subject to a fine not exceeding $5,000, imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.

(c)

Prosecution shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by information signed by the Corporation Counsel.

History

July 27, 1951, 65 Stat. 124, ch. 241, § 4
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 2(d), 32 DCR 7276

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1204.
1973 Ed., § 6-1304.